Utah statutes.
63J-1-602.1.   List of nonlapsing accounts and funds -- General authority and Title 1 through Title 30.

(1)  Appropriations made to the Legislature and its committees.

(2)  The Percent-for-Art Program created in Section 9-6-404.

(3)  The Martin Luther King, Jr. Civil Rights Support Restricted Account created in Section 9-18-102.

(4)  The LeRay McAllister Critical Land Conservation Program created in Section 11-38-301.

(5)  An appropriation made to the Division of Wildlife Resources for the appraisal and purchase of lands under the Pelican Management Act, as provided in Section 23-21a-6.

(6)  Award money under the Crime Reduction Assistance Program, as provided under Section 24-1-19.

(7)  Funds collected from the emergency medical services grant program, as provided in Section 26-8a-207.

(8)  The Prostate Cancer Support Restricted Account created in Section 26-21a-303.

(9)  State funds appropriated for matching federal funds in the Children's Health Insurance Program as provided in Section 26-40-108.

(10)  The Utah Health Care Workforce Financial Assistance Program created in Section 26-46-102.



Amended by Chapter 332, 2012 General Session

